Illinois, session 104th, HB5327.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Medical Practice Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 33 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 60/33)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4400-33)7    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2027)8    Sec. 33. Legend drugs. 9    (a) Any person licensed under this Act to practice 10medicine in all of its branches shall be authorized to 11purchase legend drugs requiring an order of a person 12authorized to prescribe drugs, and to dispense such legend 13drugs in the regular course of practicing medicine. The 14dispensing of such legend drugs shall be the personal act of 15the person licensed under this Act and may not be delegated to 16any other person not licensed under this Act or the Pharmacy 17Practice Act unless such delegated dispensing functions are 18under the direct supervision of the physician authorized to 19dispense legend drugs. Except when dispensing manufacturers' 20samples or other legend drugs in a maximum 72 hour supply, 21persons licensed under this Act shall maintain a book or file 22of prescriptions as required in the Pharmacy Practice Act. Any 23person licensed under this Act who dispenses any drug or   HB5327- 2 -LRB104 17984 AAS 31421 b1medicine shall dispense such drug or medicine in good faith 2and shall affix to the box, bottle, vessel or package 3containing the same a label indicating (1) the date on which 4such drug or medicine is dispensed; (2) the name of the 5patient; (3) the last name of the person dispensing such drug 6or medicine; (4) the directions for use thereof; and (5) the 7proprietary name or names or, if there are none, the 8established name or names of the drug or medicine, the dosage 9and quantity, except as otherwise authorized by regulation of 10the Department. 11    (b) The labeling requirements set forth in subsection (a) 12shall not apply to drugs or medicines in a package which bears 13a label of the manufacturer containing information describing 14its contents which is in compliance with requirements of the 15Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act and the Illinois Food, 16Drug, and Cosmetic Act. "Drug" and "medicine" have the 17meanings ascribed to them in the Pharmacy Practice Act, as now 18or hereafter amended; "good faith" has the meaning ascribed to 19it in subsection (u) of Section 102 of the Illinois Controlled 20Substances Act.21    (c) Prior to dispensing a prescription to a patient, the 22physician shall offer a written prescription to the patient 23which the patient may elect to have filled by the physician or 24any licensed pharmacy.25    (d) A violation of any provision of this Section shall 26constitute a violation of this Act and shall be grounds for   HB5327- 3 -LRB104 17984 AAS 31421 b1disciplinary action provided for in this Act.2    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to 3authorize a chiropractic physician to prescribe drugs.4    (f) Notwithstanding subsection (a), at the request of the 5person dispensing a drug or medicine, the label affixed to a 6box, bottle, vessel, or package containing mifepristone, 7misoprostol, or any generic alternative may include the name 8of the dispensing health care practice instead of the name of 9the person dispensing the drug or medicine. 10(Source: P.A. 97-622, eff. 11-23-11; 98-1140, eff. 12-30-14.) 11    Section 10. The Pharmacy Practice Act is amended by 12changing Section 22 as follows: 13    (225 ILCS 85/22)  (from Ch. 111, par. 4142)14    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2028)15    Sec. 22. Except as provided in this Section or only in the 16case of a drug, medicine, or poison which is lawfully sold or 17dispensed, at retail, in the original and unbroken package of 18the manufacturer, packer, or distributor thereof, and which 19package bears the original label thereon showing the name and 20address of the manufacturer, packer, or distributor thereof, 21and the name of the drug, medicine, or poison therein 22contained, and the directions for its use, no person shall 23sell or dispense, at retail, any drug, medicine, or poison, 24without affixing to the box, bottle, vessel, or package   HB5327- 4 -LRB104 17984 AAS 31421 b1containing the same, a label bearing the name of the article 2distinctly shown, and the directions for its use, with the 3name and address of the pharmacy wherein the same is sold or 4dispensed. However, in the case of a drug, medicine, or poison 5which is sold or dispensed pursuant to a prescription of a 6physician licensed to practice medicine in all of its 7branches, a physician assistant in accordance with subsection 8(f) of Section 4 of this Act, an advanced practice registered 9nurse in accordance with subsection (g) of Section 4 of this 10Act, a licensed dentist, a licensed veterinarian, a licensed 11podiatric physician, or a licensed optometrist, the label 12affixed to the box, bottle, vessel, or package containing the 13same shall show: (a) the name and address of the pharmacy 14wherein the same is sold or dispensed; (b) the name or initials 15of the person, authorized to practice pharmacy under the 16provisions of this Act, selling or dispensing the same, (c) 17the date on which such prescription was filled; (d) the name of 18the patient; (e) the serial number of such prescription as 19filed in the prescription files; (f) the last name of the 20practitioner who prescribed such prescriptions; (g) the 21directions for use thereof as contained in such prescription; 22and (h) the proprietary name or names or the established name 23or names of the drugs, the dosage and quantity, except as 24otherwise authorized by rule of the Department. At a 25prescriber's request, the label affixed to a box, bottle, 26vessel, or package containing mifepristone, misoprostol, or   HB5327- 5 -LRB104 17984 AAS 31421 b1any generic alternative may include the name of the 2prescribing health care practice instead of the name of the 3prescriber. 4(Source: P.A. 100-497, eff. 9-8-17.)